Louisiana, session 2026, SB351.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:407.30(D)(1) and 407.51(H)(1) are hereby amended and reenacted
and R.S. 17:407.29.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§407.29.1. Provisional eligibility; child care assistance program application
A. An expectant mother may apply for assistance from the Child Care
Assistance Program, through the Department of Education, prior to birth of the
child in order to preliminarily determine whether the applicant will be eligible.
B. The department shall develop a process to determine provisional
eligibility of an applicant and to later confirm eligibility after the birth of the
child. The process shall be subject to approval by the Senate and House
committees on education, meeting separately or jointly.
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 351 ENROLLED
C. The State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education shall
promulgate rules and regulations in accordance with the Administrative
Procedure Act as necessary for the implementation of this Section.
§407.30. Louisiana Early Childhood Education Fund
* * *
D.(1)(a) The fund shall be administered by the State Board of Elementary and
Secondary Education. Subject to legislative appropriation, monies in the fund shall
be awarded annually to local entities approved by the board State Board of
Elementary and Secondary Education for the purpose of funding projects that will
expand the number of early childhood care and education quality slots for families
who are eligible for the Child Care Assistance Program in Type III early learning
centers that have at least one classroom with children age fifteen months or younger
if a local entity provides funds from nonstate and nonfederal sources. No such award
shall be made unless the local entity's financial commitment to the project proposed
for funding provides matching funds from nonstate and nonfederal sources at a rate
of at least one-to-one.
(b) Each local entity shall establish eligibility criteria for the early childhood
care and education quality slots financed by local funds that serve as the match for
the award. At a minimum, only children whose family income makes them
economically disadvantaged as defined by the board State Board of Elementary
and Secondary Education shall be eligible for the slots.
* * *
§407.51. Advisory Council
* * *
H.(1) The council shall provide input and guidance to the board State Board
of Elementary and Secondary Education and the department on matters pertaining
to the development and implementation of rules, regulations, bulletins, policies, or
standards related to all early care and education programs, including early learning
centers, enrollment in early learning centers, the Cecil J. Picard LA 4 Early
Childhood Program, the Child Care and Development Fund Block Grant, the Child
Page 2 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 351 ENROLLED
Care Assistance Program, Early Head Start, and Head Start.
* * *
Section 2. This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Working Mothers'
Support Act".
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.